Utah statutes.
10-9a-611.   Prohibited acts.
(1) (a)  An owner of any land located in a subdivision who transfers or sells
any land in that subdivision before a plat of the subdivision has been
approved and recorded violates this part for each lot or parcel transferred or
sold.
(b)  The description by metes and bounds in an instrument of transfer or other
documents used in the process of selling or transferring does not exempt the
transaction from being a violation of Subsection (1)(a) or from the penalties
or remedies provided in this chapter.
(c)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Subsection (1), the recording
of an instrument of transfer or other document used in the process of selling
or transferring real property that violates this part:
(i)  does not affect the validity of the instrument or other document; and
(ii)  does not affect whether the property that is the subject of the
instrument or other document complies with applicable municipal ordinances on
land use and development.
(2) (a)  A municipality may bring an action against an owner to require the
property to conform to the provisions of this part or an ordinance enacted
under the authority of this part.
(b)  An action under this Subsection (2) may include an injunction, abatement,
merger of title, or any other appropriate action or proceeding to prevent,
enjoin, or abate the violation.
(c)  A municipality need only establish the violation to obtain the
injunction.
